




















 



 Arkados Group Launches Arkados Energy Solutions LLC 
         










    










 






 











 









Arkados Group Launches Arkados Energy Solutions LLC

		  New subsidiary will deliver innovative, sustainable, cost-saving energy solutions to both residential and commercial customers
		

Jun 05, 2014, 10:31 ET
		  		  					
						 from   Arkados Group, Inc. 











 
















































 

 




















 


NEWARK, N.J., June 5, 2014 /PRNewswire/ -- Arkados Group, Inc. (OTCQB: AKDS) ("Arkados" or the "Company"), a leading software and hardware design company focused on developing solutions that enable machine to machine communications for the Internet of Things ("IoT"), today announced the formation of a wholly-owned subsidiary, Arkados Energy Solutions LLC ("AES"). 
Leveraging our cutting edge technology and products as well as our knowledge and connections in the power industry, AES will position itself as a global energy services provider with focus on the design, installation and maintenance of innovative, sustainable, and cost-effective energy solutions for both residential and commercial customers. Our intention is that AES will implement smart grid applications primarily in the areas of LED lighting, building automation, and energy management. These applications are uniquely designed to drive a wide variety of wireless and powerline communication (PLC)-based products, such as sensors, gateways, video cameras, appliances and other devices.
Terrence DeFranco, Chief Executive Officer of Arkados Group, Inc., commented, "Following the recent successful launch of our proprietary LinqUSP and Project and Event Management software platforms and their implementation into the Gateway One and UDK-21 gateway solutions, jointly developed by Tatung and STMicroelectronics, the launch of AES marks another milestone for Arkados as we continue to pursue our vision of being a global leader in machine to machine communications for building automation and energy management. With the proprietary software platforms that allow for the command and control of cloud-based systems, unique technology and products developed by our partners and the vast opportunities in the energy management and clean tech industries, we are very excited about the opportunities that this new venture can generate and expect it to contribute meaningfully to our financials in coming quarters."   
About Arkados Group, Inc.
Arkados Group, Inc. ("Arkados" or the "Company") is a leading software and hardware design company focused on developing solutions that enable machine to machine communications for the Internet of Things (IoT). Our solutions support smart grid and smart home applications primarily in the areas of home and building automation and energy management. The Company's solutions are uniquely designed to drive a wide variety of wireless and powerline communication (PLC)-based products, such as sensors, gateways, video cameras, appliances and other devices. By utilizing the Company's solutions, Arkados' customers can bring numerous sophisticated, full-featured products to market faster at a lower overall development cost.  Arkados® is a registered trademark of Arkados Group, Inc. For more information about Arkados, please visit: http://www.arkadosgroup.com
Investor Contact:
EraStar, Inc. 
Las Vegas World Headquarters
702.480.9800
 SOURCE  Arkados Group, Inc.  

RELATED LINKS
http://www.arkadosgroup.com



  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  











Jun 11, 2014, 14:30 ET
Preview: Arkados Group to Participate in SmartAmerica Challenge













May 15, 2014, 12:02 ET
Preview: Arkados Announces Launch of Smart Factory Solution for Internet of Things






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 

Arkados, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































August 03, 2017 11:52 AM ET
Semiconductors and Semiconductor Equipment

Company Overview of Arkados, Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Arkados, Inc., a fabless semiconductor company, engages in the design, development, marketing, and sale of system-on-chip semiconductors and software solutions that enable broadband communications over standard electricity lines. The company offers a portfolio of system-on-chip solutions, firmware loads, and reference designs that enable original equipment manufacturers and original design manufacturers to develop digitally networked consumer electronic products. Its products include AI-2100 chip that delivers 200Mbps homeplug AV connectivity; AI-1100 chip product combining homeplug 1.0.1 based PHY and MAC; reference designs for synchronized whole-house audio, such as MFi iPod docks, audio r...
Arkados, Inc., a fabless semiconductor company, engages in the design, development, marketing, and sale of system-on-chip semiconductors and software solutions that enable broadband communications over standard electricity lines. The company offers a portfolio of system-on-chip solutions, firmware loads, and reference designs that enable original equipment manufacturers and original design manufacturers to develop digitally networked consumer electronic products. Its products include AI-2100 chip that delivers 200Mbps homeplug AV connectivity; AI-1100 chip product combining homeplug 1.0.1 based PHY and MAC; reference designs for synchronized whole-house audio, such as MFi iPod docks, audio receivers, Internet radio reference designs, virtual audio drivers, and low latency audio transport firmware; and video reference designs for whole house distribution of video applications that include IPTV video receivers, surveillance video receivers, and digital picture frames. The company’s solutions bridge the gap between digital entertainment, communications, and computing by using homeplug technology over the already-installed power lines. Its products are used in networking and Internet, Internet telephony, online gaming, whole house multimedia, audio, home theater and HDTV, portable devices, energy management and automation, and broadband powerline access applications. The company is based in West Caldwell, New Jersey. Arkados, Inc. operates as a subsidiary of Arkados Group, Inc.
Detailed Description


1431 Greenway DriveSuite 800Irving, TX 75038United States



Phone: 972-815-2340

Fax: 972-870-4400








Key Executives for Arkados, Inc.




Mr. Oleg Logvinov


      	Chief Executive Officer
      


Age: 54
        







Mr. Andreas A. Typaldos


      	Chairman and President
      


Age: 70
        







Ms. Barbara Kane-Burke


      	Chief Financial Officer
      


Age: 63
        







Mr. Grant Ogata


      	Executive Vice President of Worldwide Operations
      


Age: 62
        







Mr. Steve Woodman


      	Vice President of Sales and Business Development
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 1 SolTech Inc. United States 1366 Technologies, Inc. United States 21-Century Silicon, Inc. United States 3AxisData LLC United States 3DSP Corporation United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update


				\
	














 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Arkados, Inc., please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close































Management Team - Arkados Group

























































































 










































Management Team





Terrence DeFranco - Chief Executive Officer




Terrence DeFranco is Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of Arkados Group, Inc. Mr. DeFranco is also the Managing Member of OneSource Advisors, a corporate consulting firm focused on providing strategic advisory services to boards of directors of public companies and Chairman and founder of Edentify, Inc., an identity management software company.  Previously, Mr. DeFranco was Chairman and CEO of Titan International Partners, a merchant banking and research firm focused on providing corporate and strategic advisory services and equity and debt financing to small-cap and middle market companies.
His background is primarily in the area of corporate finance, management and capital raising, previously serving as head of investment banking for Baird, Patrick & Co., Inc., a 70-year old NYSE Member firm and head of investment banking and founding partner of Burlington Securities Corp., a New York based investment banking and institutional equity trading firm.
Mr. DeFranco began his career on Wall Street in 1991 with PaineWebber, Inc., now UBS PaineWebber. Mr. DeFranco has been an active principal investor, senior manager and advisor to many early-stage companies and has extensive experience in dealing with issues related to the management, operations and corporate development of startup and middle market public and private companies.  Mr. DeFranco is a graduate of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill with a BA in Economics and currently serves on other corporate and non-profit boards and committees.




Dmitry Grinberg - VP, Software Development




Dmitry Grinberg is VP, Software Development for Arkados Group, Inc.  From 1997 to the present, Mr. Grinberg has been owner of Dynamo Development, Inc., a custom software development company.  Since 2001, Dynamo has focused primarily on mid-size and start-up companies to develop technology solutions to help clients expand, provide a competitive edge and improve their efficiency.  From 1997 to 2001, Dynamo focused on integration, messaging, frameworks, reusable components and similar type of projects, including the development of its own shrink-wrapped product Dynamo MQ/X – the product was a transactional bridge between IBM MQ Series messaging product and Microsoft SQL Server to enable bi-directional transactional data flow.
After Mr. Grinberg graduated from Kiev State University with a BS in Math and Teaching, he started work as mainframe developer for state civic engineering research company.  He worked as C++ developer producing commercial product – ground-breaking 32bit 3-D CAD for HVAC industry running on MS DOS and successfully participated in Windows NT projects at Digital Equipment Corporation, Bankers Trust, McDonalds, Montgomery Ward, Deutsche Bank and Prudential.




Kuan-Ting (Tim) Lai - VP, Technology




Kuan-Ting (Tim) Lai currently serves as VP of Technology for Arkados, Inc.  Kuan-Ting is a computer vision researcher with product management experience in Taiwanese ODM companies. His research focuses on machine learning algorithms for large-scale video event detection and human action recognition. During 2012-2013, Kuan-Ting visited Columbia University in New York City and participated in several important projects. He co-developed a video event detection system with IBM T. J. Watson Research Center, and built a graph-based system for brain signal image search in a subproject of DARPA. He proposed several machine learning algorithms that can automatically learn key evidences that could be used to recognize video events. The research results have been published on top conferences such as CVPR and ECCV.
Before pursuing PhD degree, Kuan-Ting started his career in Quanta Computer as a video processing ASIC designer and participated in the development of a H.264 video encoding IC certified by Skype. He also led a team and implemented the hardware architecture of Haar-like face detection. Later he joined Chinatech as product manager and was in charge of managing OEM products’ life cycle as well as seeking new international business in United States and China. He has developed an advanced Automatic Test Equipment (ATE) for Battery Management System (BMS) of Apple’s iPhone 5. The new architecture of ATE software doubles the original test capacity.




Dr. Eric Petajan 




Dr. Eric Petajan has been an R&D leader and inventor in computer vision, graphics/animation, and video compression for decades. Eric is currently a Director at DirecTV since the recent acquisition of LiveClips where he was Chief Scientist and VP of Technology. Prior to joining LiveClips Eric was the CTO for VectorMAX Corporation and an external consultant for ab initio software. Eric joined VectorMAX via the acquisition of face2face animation, where he was Chief Scientist and Founder. Prior to founding face2face in 2000 as a Lucent Technologies venture, Eric was a Bell Labs researcher and supervisor from 1984-2000. His developments in the areas of facial motion capture, high-definition video coding, and interactive graphics systems are widely recognized. Eric was the chairman of the MPEG-4 Face and Body Animation (FBA) group, and was a leader in the development of HDTV technology and standards that led to the formation of the U.S. HDTV Grand Alliance. Eric received a PhD in Electrical Engineering in 1984 and an MS in Physics from the University of Illinois, where he created the first automatic lip-reading system




 






































Company - Arkados Group





























































































 










































ABOUT US
Connected, scalable solutions to increase efficiency and reduce cost.





Arkados Group, Inc., through its subsidiaries, is a global provider of scalable and interoperable Industrial Internet of Things (IoT) solutions that help customers increase efficiency and reduce cost.  Our cutting-edge solutions, focused on industrial automation and energy management, are comprised of our software and hardware platforms that are essentially the “building blocks” that enable the machine-to-machine communication necessary for various Smart Machines, Smart Manufacturing, Smart Building and Smart City applications.
Our approach is scalable, collaborative, and efficient. We use our software and hardware platforms to assist companies in making their machines more efficient.  By utilizing full-featured, industrial grade and standards compliant internet gateways, sensors and other peripherals along with robust cloud and data analysis capabilities, we are able to implement various types of smart solutions for machines, buildings and cities. Additionally, our services group works with customers to design and implement the most energy- and cost-efficient solutions in the areas of lighting, boiler and combined heat and power systems,  and industrial machinery.
We bring great value to our customer by taking a holistic approach to solving efficiency and cost issues and are able to deliver solutions that are easy to implement, manage and seamlessly integrate into virtually any existing system.
Arkados’ core strengths lie in our world-class expertise in software design and system integration, our experienced management team, our strong intellectual property portfolio, our flexible, scalable approach, our multi-national partnerships, our direct access to top-tier customers, as well as valuable channel and OEM partners, and unwavering commitment to collaboration and to doing more with less.





Our Mission: To improve lives, enhance productivity and reduce energy usage through advanced automation technology and sustainability services. 






CORPORATE HISTORY

 
Rich in home networking and broadband networking markets






Arkados has a rich history in home networking and broadband networking markets. Until 2011, the Company operated as a fabless semiconductor manufacturer that designed, developed, marketed, and sold technology and solutions enabling broadband communications over standard electricity lines (powerline communications or PLC).   Arkados developed a prototype of the first-ever 10Mbps powerline technology in 1999, delivered the first industry powerline communication testing tool in 2001 and was among the pioneers of powerline communications (PLC) and a founding member of the HomePlug Alliance, an leading industry-wide alliance for the development and adoption of standards for powerline communications.  In addition, Arkados has achieved several distinguishing awards, including having products being named “Best of the Best” at the International Computer Electronics Show in 2008 and 2009.
In December, 2010, Arkados made a strategic decision to sell its semiconductor intellectual property assets and technology licenses, which were licensed from STMicroelectronics in 2008, back to STMicroelectronics for cash and make the product design and software development segments of the business the primary focus.
Since the asset sale, Arkados has restructured its balance sheet, hired key personnel, secured strategic partners and positioned itself to as a leading product and software innovator focused on delivering solutions for IoT applications.










































Eric D. Petajan - Professional at ARKADOS GROUP, INC.
































































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              





























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Eric D. Petajan
Professional at ARKADOS GROUP, INC.



Overview
Relationships Paths
Education Career History Investments 


Eric D. Petajan
Professional at ARKADOS GROUP, INC.



 Overview



Number of Relationships



                This person is connected to 862 people.
              






 Relationships
              See Details




John Dorocki

Senior Vice President at VectorMAX Corp.




James Romano

Professional at VectorMAX Corp.





Kuan-Ting Lai

Vice President, Technology at ARKADOS GROUP, INC.




Dmitry Grinberg

Vice President, Software Development at ARKADOS GROUP, INC.





Kenneth R. Vennera

Former General Counsel at ARKADOS GROUP, INC.




George Caravias

Former Chief Executive Officer at Face2face Animation, Inc.





Thomas W. Pragias

President at VectorMAX Corp.




Paul Lepore

Vice President-Product Development at VectorMAX Corp.





Terrence M. DeFranco

Chairman, President, Chief Executive Officer & Chief Financial Officer at ARKADOS GROUP, INC.




Andreas Typaldos

Chief Executive Officer at Scalix Corp.







See 852 more listings with RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See 852 More 


 


 Paths to Eric D. Petajan



            Eric D. Petajan          




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Eric D. Petajan






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Eric D. Petajan.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Educational Background



Ph.D Electrical Engineering 


University of Illinois at Urbana - Champaign

                  The University of Illinois at Urbana–Champaign is a public research-intensive university in the U.S. state of Illinois. It is the flagship campus of the University of Illinois system. The University of Illinois at Urbana–Champaign is the second oldest public university in the state (after Illinois State University), and is a founding member of the Big Ten Conference. It is considered a Public Ivy and is a member of the Association of American Universities.                




BS Physics 


The University of Utah

                  The University of Utah is a public coeducational space-grant research university in Salt Lake City, Utah, United States. As the state's flagship university, the university offers more than 100 undergraduate majors and more than 92 graduate degree programs. Graduate studies include the S.J. Quinney College of Law and the School of Medicine.The university was established in 1850 as the University of Deseret by the General Assembly of the provisional State of Deseret, making it Utah's oldest institution of higher education.It received its current name in 1892, four years before Utah attained statehood, and moved to its current location in 1900.                





 Career History



Professional

                                    Current                


ARKADOS GROUP, INC.


                  Arkados Group, Inc. engages in the provision of scalable and interoperable Internet of Things solutions focused on industrial automation and energy management. It operates through the Arkados and AES segments. The Arkados segment develops proprietary, cloud-based device and system management software solutions, which refer to as the Arktic software platform, and delivers software services and support. The AES segment provides energy conservation services and solutions to commercial and buildings. The company was founded in 1998 and is headquartered in Fairfield, NJ.                




Chief Technology Officer

                                    2005 - 2009                


VectorMAX Corp.


                  VectorMAX Corp. provides video solutions for the enterprise and the Web. It provides solutions to media and entertainment companies, broadcasters, educational institutions, and government organizations. Its applications are designed to operate on basic network infrastructures, standard computing equipment, and multiple operating platforms. The company is headquartered in Jersey City, NJ.                




Chief Scientific Officer

                                    2000 - Prior                


Face2face Animation, Inc.


                  Face2face Animation, Inc. provides three dimensional (3D) facial animation software solutions for television, electronic gaming, and the internet. It develops software for facial motion capture and analysis for a broad range of animation applications. The company was founded by Eric D. Petajan in 2000 and is headquartered in Summit, NJ.                




Researcher & Supervisor

                                    1984 - 2000                


Bell Labs


                  Bell Laboratories provides research and development services. It provides communications technologies including transistors, digital networking, signal processing, lasers and fiber-optic communications systems, communication satellites, cellular telephony, electronic switching of calls, touch-tone dialing and modems. The company was founded in 1925 and is headquartered in Murray Hill, NJ.                




Chief Scientist & Vice President-Technology

                                    Prior                


LiveClips LLC


                  LiveClips LLC develops and delivers video content from live sporting events for any Internet enabled devices. Its advanced technology automates the previously time and labor intensive processes of creating game clips and highlights, enabling broadcasters and rights holders to dramatically increase the efficiency of its sports coverage. The company was founded by Gregg Dearth and Douglas Vunic in 2008 and is headquartered in Wilmington, DE.                





 Investments



 Details Hidden


Face2face Animation, Inc.

                  Face2face Animation, Inc. provides three dimensional (3D) facial animation software solutions for television, electronic gaming, and the internet. It develops software for facial motion capture and analysis for a broad range of animation applications. The company was founded by Eric D. Petajan in 2000 and is headquartered in Summit, NJ.                





 Other Affiliations




              Eric D. Petajan is affiliated with
                            ARKADOS GROUP, INC., VectorMAX Corp., Face2face Animation, Inc., Bell Labs, LiveClips LLC.
            




You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.












Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤













 Arkados Group, Inc. Reports Fiscal First Quarter 2017 Results - Padtronics                                WHAT IS ECHO?HOW TOTIPS&TRICKSREVIEWSMOREAppsAmazon UpdatesEditor’s PicksFeature AnnouncementsHow To’sRecommendedCompatible ServicesSkillsUser TipsPRODUCTSPhillips HueIFTTTIHeartRadioPandora  Search    Padtronics WHAT IS ECHO?HOW TOTIPS&TRICKSREVIEWSMOREAppsAmazon UpdatesEditor’s PicksFeature AnnouncementsHow To’sRecommendedCompatible ServicesSkillsUser TipsPRODUCTSPhillips HueIFTTTIHeartRadioPandora   Home  LatestArkados Group, Inc. Reports Fiscal First Quarter 2017 ResultsRevenues up nearly 400% Year-Over-Year, Reflect Rising Demand for Energy Conservation Services and Industrial Internet of Things SolutionsNEWARK, N.J., Nov. 02, 2016 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) — Arkados Group, Inc. (OTCQB:AKDS), a global provider of scalable and interoperable Internet of Things (IoT) solutions focused on industrial automation and energy management, today announced and commented on the Company’s consolidated financial and operational results for the fiscal first quarter 2017 ending on August 31, 2016.Financial and Operational Highlights for the Three Months Ended August 31, 2016:Revenues increased to $424,487, up $106,836 or 397% year-over-year, due to an increase in demand for our energy conservation services business;Net loss decreased year-over-year from ($528,761) to ($286,974), as a result of lower operating expenses and an increase in revenue; and,Launched our boiler conversion services to reduce energy costs and help local property owners comply with NY local law 43. Our initial customer is a local university for a two-site Oil-to-Natural Gas boiler conversion.“We are very pleased with our first quarter results. Our financial performance continues to improve with extraordinary year-over-year revenue growth and an expansion of our services, products and customer base.  In Fiscal Year 2017 we expect to continue to expand our services business with additional, value-add offerings, and introduce new, cutting-edge technology products, both with the goal of reducing cost and improving productivity for our commercial and industrial customers. The forthcoming products will run on our recently released Arktic software platform and leverage the unique scalability and interoperability that commercial applications demand. We look forward to a very successful year and to further establishing Arkados as a leading provider of Industrial Internet of Things solutions for smart building, smart city and smart machine applications.”The Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended August 31, 2016 is on file with Securities and Exchange Commission. To access the report visit http://ir.arkadosgroup.com/.The Industrial Internet of Things is an explosive opportunity according to research firm Markets and Markets, which projects the IIoT market size to reach $151 billion by 2020 and just the smart building segment to reach $24 billion.   In a November 2015 press release, Gartner estimates that the Internet of Things will support total professional services (defined as external providers that design, install and operate IoT systems for businesses under contract) spending of $235 billion in 2016, up 22% from 2015, and that connectivity services (through communications service providers) and consumer services will grow at an even faster pace. Another more recent Gartner report estimates IoT deployment in commercial buildings is on track to reach just over 1 billion in 2018.Verizon’s The Internet of Things 2015 report revealed that among organizations having integrated IoT into their operations, 82% reported increased efficiency; 49% saw enhancements in product quality; and 45% claimed IoT technology has increased customer satisfaction.About Arkados Group, Inc.Arkados Group, Inc. through its subsidiaries is a global provider of scalable and interoperable Internet of Things (IoT) solutions focused on industrial automation and energy management. The Company’s solutions are uniquely designed to drive a wide variety of wireless and powerline communication (PLC)-based products, such as sensors, gateways, video cameras, appliances and other devices. By utilizing the Company’s solutions, Arkados’ customers can bring numerous sophisticated, full-featured products to market faster at a lower overall development cost.  Arkados® is a registered trademark of Arkados Group, Inc. For more information about Arkados, please visit us at http://www.arkadosgroup.com, and follow us on Facebook, LinkedIn, Twitter and Google+.Forward-Looking StatementsThis news release contains forward-looking statements as defined by the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements include statements concerning plans, objectives, goals, strategies, future events or performance, and underlying assumptions and other statements that are other than statements of historical facts.  These statements are subject to uncertainties and risks including, but not limited to, insufficient working capital, product and service demand and acceptance, changes in technology, economic conditions, the impact of competition and pricing, government regulations, and other risks contained in reports filed by the company with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All such forward-looking statements, whether written or oral, and whether made by or on behalf of the company, are expressly qualified by this cautionary statement and any other cautionary statements which may accompany the forward-looking statements. In addition, the company disclaims any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date hereof.
Investor Contact:

Investor Relations
investors@arkadosgroup.com
Source: Arkados Group, Inc.Fire TV Stick Echo Dot Echo Fire TV Echo Show Fire TV Gaming RELATED ARTICLESMORE FROM AUTHOR LatestAlexa vs Siri vs Bixby Rap Battle! LatestNew Line of Defense – Home Earthquake Sensor Raspberry 4D LatestApple demos HomeKit in stores LatestAmazon Echo Ring Color – Delivery Notifications LatestGoogle Home Features – New Functionality Detailed LatestSamsung Vega Standalone Voice Assistant – Bixby vs Alexa, Home, CortanaMOST POPULAR  Amazon Fire TV and Alexa team-up!   How to use Alexa on Fire TV   How to get an Amazon Echo Dot without Alexa   How to use multiple accounts on one Amazon Echo.   Amazon to launch Echo, Alexa in Netherlands - sources   Using iHeartRadio with Amazon Echo   Forget the App, Control Amazon Echo in Your Web Browser   Amazon Echo Dot and Tap: Cheaper Alternatives to Echo FREE AMAZON PRIME – 30 DAY TRIAL30-Day Free Trial   SUBSCRIBE TO OUR NEWSLETTEREnter your email address to subscribe to Padtronics and receive notifications of new posts by email.  Email Address         ABOUT USPadtronics offers in-depth analysis, product reviews, and personal recommendations to help you build your connected home.   Any reviews or recommendations on this site are made without bias or influence from any advertiser or partner.   Contact us: info@padtronics.comFOLLOW US                    Community GuidelinesEthics PolicyPrivacy PolicyTerms of UseContact © Copyright 2017 - Padtronics            Edit with Live CSS     





Silicon Product Development And Production Collaboration Agreement - Collaboration Agreement - Free Search.
















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Collaboration Agreement     > SILICON PRODUCT DEVELOPMENT AND PRODUCTION COLLABORATION AGREEMENT

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents











SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>

















Silicon Product Development And Production Collaboration Agreement
Collaboration Agreement



You are currently viewing:
 This Collaboration Agreement involves ARKADOS GROUP INC | GDA Technologies, Inc. RealDealDocs™ contains millions of easily searchable legal documents and clauses from top law firms. Search for free - click here.  
                  



Title: SILICON PRODUCT DEVELOPMENT AND PRODUCTION COLLABORATION AGREEMENT Governing Law: New York      Date: 4/28/2006 









Preview

Edit & Save 

Related Documents 



50 of the Top 250 law firms use our Products every day









                                                                  
EXHIBIT 10.23
                                                                  
-------------


CONFIDENTIAL TREATMENT HAS BEEN REQUESTED FOR PORTIONS OF THIS
EXHIBIT. THE COPY
FILED HEREWITH OMITS THE INFORMATION SUBJECT TO THE CONFIDENTIALITY
REQUEST.
OMISSIONS ARE DESIGNATED AS *. A COMPLETE VERSION OF THIS EXHIBIT
HAS BEEN FILED
SEPARATELY WITH THE SECRETARY OF THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE
COMMISSION.

                          
SILICON PRODUCT DEVELOPMENT
                          
---------------------------
                                      
AND
                                      
---
                      
PRODUCTION COLLABORATION AGREEMENT
                      
----------------------------------

Silicon Product Development and Production Collaboration Agreement
(this
"Agreement"), dated as of July 28, 2004 (the "Effective Date"), is
by and
between GDA Technologies, Inc., a California corporation having
principal place
of business at 1010 Rincon Circle, San Jose, CA , 95131 ("GDA"),
and Arkados,
Inc., a Delaware Corporation having its principal place of business
at 948 US
Highway 22, North Plainfield, NJ 07060 ("Arkados"). GDA and Arkados
are referred
to individually hereinafter as a "Party" and collectively as the
"Parties".

                                   
RECITALS
                                   
--------

    
WHEREAS, Arkados has created and markets a power line based
technology that
permits data transmission over active "in-building" power networks
and also
developed technology for data transmission over powerline
distribution networks;

    
WHEREAS, Arkados has designed a semiconductor component for
in-building
power networks and owns certain technology related thereto and GDA
possesses
know-how relating to the development, fabrication, and testing of
semiconductor
products;

    
WHEREAS, GDA and Arkados desire to collaborate in the production of
a
semiconductor component product for in-building power networks that
will be sold
by Arkados in the open market;

    
WHEREAS, the parties will explore future cooperation related to
other
semiconductor products of Arkados. The Parties may enter into one
or more
separate agreements with respect to such future cooperation if they
see fit for
their business.

                                   
AGREEMENT

     NOW,
THEREFORE, in consideration of the above recitals and the
mutual
promises and covenants contained herein, the Parties hereby agree
as follows:

ARTICLE I. DEFINITIONS

     For
purposes of this Agreement, the terms defined in this Article
shall
have the meanings specified below:

                                       
1
<PAGE>

1.1       
"AFFILIATE" shall mean any corporation or other entity, which
         
controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, a
Party
         
to this Agreement. A corporation or other entity shall be regarded
as
         
in control of another corporation or entity if it owns or directly
or
         
indirectly controls at least fifty-one (51) percent of the
voting
         
stock or other voting equity interest of the other corporation
or
         
entity.

1.2        "GDA
SERVICES" shall mean the services to be provided by GDA
pursuant
         
to this Agreement and as outlined in Annex-A. Details of the
GDA
         
Services shall be as described in Task Orders to be entered into
by
         
the Parties. GDA shall perform the GDA Services in a
professional
         
manner using qualified personnel.

1.3       
"BUSINESS DAY" shall mean all days other than Saturdays, Sundays,
and
         
other days on which United States banks are closed.

1.4       
"DESIGN LICENSE" shall have the meaning set forth in Section
3.1.

1.5       
"EFFECTIVE DATE" shall have the meaning set forth in the preamble
this
         
Agreement.

1.6       
"FOUNDRY" shall mean a third party foundry selected by Arkados, in
its
         
discretion after consultation with GDA, to provide silicon
foundry
         
services with respect to the Product.

1.7       
"INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS" shall mean any and all (i)
Letters
         
Patent and all pending applications for Letters Patent, including
any
         
reissue, reexamination, division, continuation, or
         
continuation-in-part applications throughout the world; (ii)
trade
         
secret rights and equivalent rights arising under the common
law,
         
state law, federal law, and laws of foreign countries; (iii)
         
copyrights, mask works, other literary property or authors
rights,
         
whether or not protected by copyright or as a mask work, under
common
         
law, state law, federal law, and laws of foreign countries; and
(iv)
         
proprietary indicia, trademarks, service marks, trade names,
symbols,
         
logos, and/or brand names under common law, state law, federal
law,
         
and laws of foreign countries.

1.8       
"NECESSARY CLAIMS" shall mean those claims of all patents, other
than
         
design patents and design registrations, which are necessarily
         
infringed by an implementation of standards based technologies
         
incorporated into the Product which cannot be avoided by
another
         
commercially reasonable non-infringing implementation of such
         
standards based technologies.

1.9       
"PRELIMINARY SPECIFICATIONS" means the preliminary functional
         
specifications for the Product that set forth in Annex-B.

                                       
2
<PAGE>

1.10       "PRODUCT"
shall mean the semiconductor component product that Arkados
         
has code-named "PowerWave" and the specification of which
conforms
         
substantially to the Specification.

1.11       "PRODUCT
TECHNOLOGY" shall mean any Intellectual Property Rights in
         
and to any technology that is developed or improved by a Party
in
         
connection with the development activities relating to the
Product
         
that are carried out under this Agreement, Using Arkados' or
Arkados'
         
licensors intellectual property.

1.12     
  "PRODUCT-RELATED
MATERIALS" shall mean drawings, documents,
         
specifications, designs and other materials, whether in tangible
or
         
electronic form, that comprise or incorporate Product
Technology.
         
Except for PG-tape, mask set, CP testing program and FT testing
         
program.

1.13      
"PRODUCTION COST" shall mean the sum of the following: Foundry
die
         
cost, assembly and package cost, component test cost, and any
         
royalties payable by Arkados directly or indirectly through GDA to
any
         
third party by reason of the incorporation of any IP blocks of
such
         
third party in the Product or otherwise by reason of the making
or
         
selling of the Product. Production Cost shall be denominated in
US
         
dollars. (Royalties related to licensing of Necessary Claims shall
not
         
be included in Production Cost. Production Cost shall be determined
by
         
Arkados within fifteen (15) days after the end of each fiscal
         
quarter.)

1.14       "SIGNOFF"
shall mean the iteration of data In and Physical Layout will
         
be repeated until the results of netlist, timing and post
simulation
         
satisfies both Parties by signing a sign-off document

1.15      
"SPECIFICATIONS" means the Preliminary Specifications, as
modified
         
from time to time by Arkados in its sole discretion.

1.16       "STEERING
COMMITTEE" shall mean a committee consisting of
         
representatives of each of Arkados and GDA that are designated
from
         
time to time by the respective Party. The Steering Committee will
meet
         
at least once a month pursuant to an agreed schedule. The members
of
         
the Steering Committee are specified in Annex D. The Parties
agree
         
that either party may change its designated representatives
provided
         
the other Party is notified in writing in advance and approves
such
         
change, such approval shall not to be unreasonably withheld or
         
delayed. The Steering Committee shall act only by unanimous
agreement
         
of its members; provided that if the Steering Committee is
deadlocked
         
on any issue that the it is assigned responsibility under this
         
Agreement to determine or resolve, the issue shall be determined
or
         
resolved by the Presidents of each of the Parties, who shall
determine
         
or resolve the issue by mutual agreement.

1.17       "THIRD
PARTIES" shall mean any person or entity other than Arkados and
         
GDA or their respective Affiliates.

                                       
3
<PAGE>

1.18       "TASK
ORDER" shall mean a separate addendum to this Agreement setting
         
forth the specific GDA Services to be performed by GDA pursuant
to
         
this Agreement. Task Orders entered into by the parties shall:
(i)
         
refer expressly to this Agreement; (ii) designate the date as of
which
         
the provisions of the Task Order will be effective and, if
applicable,
         
the term or period of time during which GDA will perform
services,
         
provide resources or otherwise discharge its obligations as
specified
         
in the Task Order; (iii) describe the services to be performed,
         
resources to be provided or obligations to be discharged by GDA
         
pursuant to the Task Order and any applicable development
milestones
         
and acceptance requirements; (iv) describe the obligations of
Arkados
         
related to the Task Order, including any facilities, equipment,
         
personnel and tasks or other support to be provided or performed
by
         
Arkados; and (v) specify any other terms and conditions appropriate
to
         
the services to be performed and the obligations of the
Parties.

1.19       "GDA
DELIVERABLES" shall mean materials resulted from performance of
         
GDA services by GDA pursuant to this agreement and as outlined
in
         
Annex-A.

ARTICLE II.                
GENERAL STRUCTURE OF RELATIONSHIP

2.1        ROLE
OF ARKADOS. The Parties agree and acknowledge that, subject to
         
the performance by GDA of the GDA Services, Arkados is responsible
for
         
completion of the design and development of the Product, including
the
         
design and development of (i) powerline MAC layer, Powerline PHY
layer
         
and related hardware blocks, which will be the core of the
Product;
         
(ii) overall Product architecture; and (iii) relevant firmware
and
         
software drivers for the Product. In connection with such design
and
         
development, Arkados shall be responsible for preparing the
         
deliverables listed in Annex-A (marked as Arkados deliverables
ARK-DE)
         
hereto (the "Arkados Deliverables").

2.2       
INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY OWNERSHIP. Arkados is and shall remain the
sole
         
owner of all Intellectual Property Rights associated with the
Product
         
and related technologies, including without limitation all
Product
         
Technology and Product-Related Materials and any derivative
works
         
based on any of the foregoing, subject to any grant by Arkados of
the
         
Design License pursuant to Section 3.1.

2.3       
PERFORMANCE OF SERVICES BY GDA. GDA will provide to Arkados the
GDA
         
Services in accordance with the terms of Task Orders enter into by
and
         
between Arkados and GDA. GDA and Arkados agree to negotiate in
good
         
faith the terms of, and to use reasonable efforts to enter into,
the
         
initial Task Order providing for the performance by GDA of the
GDA
      
    Services
outlined in Annex-A hereto within 30days of the Effective
         
Date. GDA shall perform the GDA Services in accordance with the
terms
         
of the relevant Task Order and will use its best efforts to
comply
         
with the project schedule set out in Annex-C, as it may be amended
by
         
mutual agreement in writing from time to time. If GDA determines
that
         
it is unable or unwilling to continue with the development of
the
         
Product pursuant to this Agreement (including by reason of
cessation
         
of business or the bankruptcy of

                                       
4
<PAGE>

         
GDA) GDA agrees to negotiate in good faith with Arkados the terms
of
         
mutually acceptable alternative arrangements for continuing with
the
         
development and manufacture of the Product, which would include
         
providing Arkados with a license to use the GDA Deliverables and
other
         
information owned by GDA, data and information including
business
         
relationships needed to complete the development and production of
the
         
Product.

2.4       
DELIVERY. GDA shall use commercially reasonable efforts to deliver
GDA
         
Deliverables specified in Annex A and Annex C for testing
and/or
         
acceptance. At each delivery, GDA shall memorialize such delivery
in a
         
signed delivery confirmation sheet that sets forth the nature
and
         
condition of the GDA Deliverables, the medium in which GDA
         
Deliverables reside, and the date of the delivery. Arkados
shall
         
countersign such delivery confirmation sheet so as to indicate
the
         
receipt of the contents described therein.

2.5       
TESTING AND ACCEPTANCE. Upon receipt of GDA Deliverables,
Arkados
          
shall immediately commence, and conclude as promptly as
practical,
         
acceptance testing of such deliverable items in accordance with
         
acceptance criteria mutually agreeable to both parties. Upon
         
completion of such acceptance testing, Arkados shall issue to GDA
a
         
notice of acceptance or a notice of rejection. In the event of
         
rejection, Arkados shall give its reasons for rejection in
reasonable
         
detail, and GDA shall use its reasonable effort to correct the
         
deficiency or nonconformity and redeliver the GDA Deliverables
as
         
promptly as practical. In the event Arkados has not delivered a
notice
         
of acceptance or a notice of rejection within 15 business days
of
         
receipt of GDA Deliverables, Arkados will be deemed to have
accepted
         
such GDA Deliverables.

2.4       
MANUFACTURING OF PRODUCT. Arkados will be responsible for the
         
manufacturing of the Product; provided, that GDA, acting on behalf
of
          
Arkados, will be responsible for (i) negotiating (subject to
Arkados'
         
approval) the terms of a foundry agreement with the Foundry
under
         
which the Product would be manufactured, including without
limitation
         
any pricing terms, (ii) monitoring and managing the Foundry's
         
performance under the foundry agreement; and (iii) accepting,
         
packaging and testing Product delivered by the Foundry.

2.5       
BRANDING Product will be sold under the Arkados logo as a brand
name
         
or such other names as Arkados, in its sole discretion, shall
select.
         
The size and location of any placement of the Arkados logo on
the
         
Product or any packaging will be determined by Arkados.

ARTICLE III. LICENSE GRANT

3.1       
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, Arkados
hereby
         
grants to GDA, a personal, nonexclusive, and nontransferable
internal
         
use license to use (the "Design License") Arkados' Intellectual
         
Property Rights in and to the Product solely for the purpose of
         
performing GDA Services and its obligations

                                       
5
<PAGE>

         
pursuant to this Agreement, including without limitation in
connection
         
with the design and development of Product Technology or
         
Product-Related Materials. No right to sublicense is granted to
GDA
         
hereunder.

3.2       
Arkados and its licensors retain sole and exclusive title to
and
         
ownership of the Intellectual Property Rights in and to the
Product
         
and the technologies incorporated therein and any derivative
works
         
based thereon, including all copies, whether made by Arkados or
GDA
         
and regardless of the form or media in or on which the original
and
         
copies may exist Arkados and its licensors retain sole and
exclusive
         
title to and ownership of any and all modifications and updates to
or
         
of such Intellectual Property Rights made by Arkados and its
         
licensors. Arkados shall have sole and exclusive title to and
         
ownership of the Product Technology, the Product-Related
Materials.

3.3       
Arkados, as the sole and exclusive owner of the Intellectual
Property
         
Rights in the Product, shall have full responsibility, in its
sole
         
discretion, for filing, prosecuting and maintaining of patents
and/or
         
other applications or registrations worldwide with respect to
any
         
patentable or registerable inventions associated with the
Product.

3.4       
Except as expressly provided in this Agreement, GDA shall not,
and
         
shall not permit any third party to, use, copy, modify,
sublicense,
         
distribute or otherwise transfer to any third party, the
Intellectual
         
Property Rights, the Product Technology or the Product-Related
         
Materials or any other product or technology incorporating or
         
utilizing any Intellectual Property Rights of Arkados.

3.5        GDA
will promptly disclose to Arkados all inventions relating to or
         
based upon Product Technology, Product-Related Materials and
         
Intellectual Property Rights developed by GDA during the Term and
will
         
execute such assignment, and other documents reasonably requested
by
         
Arkados, to perfect and record Arkados' rights as set forth in
         
paragraph 3.3 above.

ARTICLE IV. PAYMENTS

4.1        In
consideration of the work performed under the paragraph 1 of
the
         
Initial Task Order (a) Arkados will pay GDA $* (*). Arkados will
pay
         
$* as advance at the start of the project and the remaining
($*)
         
payments to be made in equal monthly installments of $* (*) for
the
         
first * months of the project. Parties further agree that above
         
described payments could be made in a form of * if mutually agreed
by
         
the parties at the time when a specific payment is due. If no
         
agreement is reached then payment will occur in cash. Should GDA
fails
          
to adhere to mutually agreed upon schedule Arkados has the right
to
         
stop payments and parties shall resolve the issue as provided for
in
         
2.3. If the project is terminated for any reason, all payments owed
up
         
to and including the termination date shall be due and payable in
full
         
immediately upon termination; and

                                       
6
<PAGE>

         
(b) CDKnet.Com, Inc., Arkados' corporate parent and a Delaware
         
corporation, ("CDK") shall issue an aggregate of 150,000 shares of
its
         
common stock to GDA pursuant to a Restricted Stock Purchase
Agreement.

4.2        In
consideration of the work performed under the paragraph 2 of
the
         
Initial Task Order Arkados will pay GDA the fee that shall be
         
calculated as ** GDA shall provide all necessary information to
allow
         
Arkados to determine Production Cost and Product quantities.

4.3        GDA
will be solely responsible for payment to the Foundry and other
         
Third Parties for the following: Foundry NRE, mask charges,
         
engineering (sample) lot production fee, packaging NRE, testing
NRE
         
and other tooling related fees, but will be promptly reimbursed
by
         
Arkados upon written request of GDA. Such written request shall
be
         
accompanied with all necessary supporting information that would
allow
         
Arkados to confirm such costs. If re-spins of the Product are
         
necessary, the responsibility for the cost of such re-spins shall
be
         
determined as provided in Section 4.4. GDA will need advance
payment
         
from Arkados for making such payments.

4.4        If a
new production run is needed due to a logic design flaw or
other
         
defects for which Arkados is responsible, Arkados will be
solely
         
responsible for the incremental fees and costs associated with the
new
         
production run. If a new production run is needed due to
problems,
         
which relate to an aspect of the GDA Services for which GDA is
         
responsible GDA will redo the required services free of charge to
get
         
to the new production but the incremental fees and costs
associated
         
with the new production run will be equally split between GDA
and
         
Arkados.

ARTICLE V.                 
CONFIDENTIALITY

5.1       
Nondisclosure Obligations. During the term of this Agreement and
for a
         
period of three (3) years thereafter, each Party shall maintain
in
         
confidence and use only for purposes of this Agreement any
information
         
supplied by the other Party (whether or not designated at the time
of
         
disclosure as "confidential" or the like) either in writing or
         
verbally in connection with this Agreement, including
information
         
exchanged pursuant to the Mutual Confidentiality Agreement. For
         
purpose of this Article V, such information and data that has been
so
         
supplied by a Party shall be referred to herein as
"Information."
         
Notwithstanding the foregoing, to the extent it is reasonably
         
necessary or appropriate to fulfill its obligations under this
         
Agreement, a Party may disclose Information to its Affiliates,
         
consultants, and outside contractors, strictly on a
need-to-know
         
basis, on the condition that such entities or persons shall
have
         
agreed in writing to keep the Information confidential for the
same
         
time periods and to the same extent as such Party is required to
keep
         
the Information confidential; and a Party may disclose such
         
Information to government or other regulatory authorities to
the
         
extent that such disclosure is reasonably necessary to obtain
patents
         
or authorizations to conduct

                                       
7
<PAGE>

         
trials with and to commercially market the Product or if such
         
disclosure is required by applicable law or order of the court.
The
         
obligation not to disclose Information shall not apply to any part
of
         
such Information that (i) is or becomes patented, published, or
         
otherwise part of the public domain other than by acts of the
Party
         
obligated not to disclose such Information or its Affiliates or
sub
         
licensees in contravention of this Agreement; or (ii) is disclosed
to
         
the receiving Party or its Affiliates by a Third Party, unless
such
         
Information was obtained by such Third Party directly or
indirectly
         
from the other Party to this Agreement on a confidential basis;
or
         
(iii) prior to disclosure under this Agreement, was already in
the
         
possession of the receiving Party or its Affiliates, unless
such
         
Information was obtained directly or indirectly from the other
Party
         
to this Agreement on a confidential basis.

5.2       
Terms of This Agreement. Arkados and GDA each agrees not to
disclose
         
any terms or conditions of this Agreement to any Third Party
without
         
the prior written consent of the other Party hereto, except as
         
required by applicable laws or except to such Party's existing
or
         
prospective investors, lenders or possible acquirers or merger
         
partners that are bound by appropriate confidentiality
undertakings.

5.4       
Press Releases and Public Disclosure. No Party shall make a
press
         
release or public disclosure related to the Project, without
first
         
obtaining the written consent of the other Party, which consent
may
         
not be unreasonably withheld.

ARTICLE VI INTENTIONALLY OMITTED.

ARTICLE VII. TERM AND TERMINATION

7.1       
EFFECTIVE DATE. This Agreement shall become effective as of the
         
Effective Date.

7.2       
EXPIRATION. This Agreement shall expire at the end of five (5)
years
         
from the Effective Date unless earlier terminated as provided
herein.

7.3       
TERMINATION FOR CAUSE. Either Party may termi




 








 




















































Arkados Group, Inc. Reports Strong Fiscal 2016 Results - OTCMarkets.com





















OTC Markets


 





Home




Marketplaces















Market Activity



Current Market


Closing Summary


Broker Dealer Data


Corporate Actions


Short Sale Data


Reg SHO Data





News



Company News & Financials


Press Releases


Videos & Presentations


RSS Feeds


OTC Markets Events


OTC Markets Newsletter


OTC Markets Press Center





Services



Companies


Investors


Market Data


OTC Link® ATS





Research



Stock Screener


OTCQX Company List


Company Directory


Service Provider Directory


OTCQX Sponsors


Research Marketplace


Broker Dealer Directory


Prohibited Attorney List


Symbology


Glossary





Learn



Our Marketplaces


Market 101


Investor Protection


Reporting Requirements


American Depositary Receipts (ADRs)


How to Get Traded


Caveat Emptor Policy


FINRA & SEC Rules


Whitepapers


FAQs






 

 
 
 








Company Directory

|

Stock Screener







OTC Market Totals

-
Securities

-
Dollar Volume

-
Share Volume

-
Trades






 





Quote
Charts
Company Profile
News
Financials
Filings and Disclosure
Short Sales
Insider Disclosure
Research Reports
Videos and Presentations














AKDS


Arkados Group, Inc.














 


                
                    Common Stock
                
                
            

                    SEC Reporting - Current
                




				 Pink Current Information 
				
			









































 

OTC Disclosure & News Service








 

Arkados Group, Inc. Reports Strong Fiscal 2016 Results
Oct 04, 2016
OTC Disclosure & News Service

                            
                                - 
NEWARK, N.J., Oct.  04, 2016  (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Arkados Group, Inc. (OTCQB:AKDS), a global provider of scalable and interoperable Internet of Things (IoT) solutions focused on industrial automation and energy management, today comments on the Company’s consolidated financial and operational results for the fiscal year ended May 31, 2016.
Financial Highlights for the Year Ended May 31, 2016: Revenues increased to $1.87 million, up $1.39 million or 286% from $484,262 reported in fiscal 2015, due to growth in both its technology and service customer segments;Software segment revenues came in at $730,249, up 81% over the last fiscal year due to growing volumes in our smart factory and smart building products;Energy Conservation Services segment contributed $1.14 million to revenues, up $1.06 million from $80,410 in fiscal 2015, demonstrating a strong ramp-up in this business segment since inception; andShareholder equity increased by approximately $1.7 million this year over fiscal 2015 and by approximately $7.7 million since new management took over in 2013. “We are extremely pleased with our achievements made in fiscal 2016,” said Terrence DeFranco, Arkados’ Chief Executive Officer.  “This year marks a turning point for the company as we have experienced growth across all sectors of our business.”  “We have successfully grown our business from zero sales in 2014, to where we are today,” adds DeFranco. “Our goal is to continue to grow revenues by focusing efforts on bringing value to our customers through innovation and cost savings.  In turn, our shareholders benefit from the attractive margins associated with our products and services.”  “FY2017 will be an exciting year in our evolution as we introduce new products, acquire new customers, scale our operations and ultimately drive more value to our shareholders,” concludes DeFranco.  “As a solutions provider on the forefront of the Industrial Internet of Things revolution, opportunities abound and our team is poised to execute our business strategy and make Arkados a significant player in this exploding market.” For more information on Arkados’ financial and operational performance for the fiscal year ended May 31, 2016 and to view the Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, click here.   About Arkados Group, Inc. Arkados Group, Inc., through its subsidiaries, is a global provider of scalable and interoperable IoT solutions focused on industrial automation and energy management. Our business focuses on software development and system integration, and developing unique, cutting-edge solutions on our Arktic software platform that enable machine to machine communications with specific applications for energy efficiency, predictive maintenance and other solutions that reduce costs and improve returns on investment for our customers. Arkados® is a registered trademark of Arkados Group, Inc. For more information about Arkados, please visit us at http://www.arkadosgroup.com, and follow us on Facebook, LinkedIn, Twitter and Google+. Forward-Looking Statements This news release contains forward-looking statements as defined by the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements include statements concerning plans, objectives, goals, strategies, future events or performance, and underlying assumptions and other statements that are other than statements of historical facts.  These statements are subject to uncertainties and risks including, but not limited to, insufficient working capital, product and service demand and acceptance, changes in technology, economic conditions, the impact of competition and pricing, government regulations, and other risks contained in reports filed by the company with the Securities and Exchange Commission. All such forward-looking statements, whether written or oral, and whether made by or on behalf of the company, are expressly qualified by this cautionary statement and any other cautionary statements which may accompany the forward-looking statements. In addition, the company disclaims any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date hereof.
Investor Contact:

Investor Relations

investors@arkadosgroup.com


Copyright © 2016 GlobeNewswire. All Rights Reserved
The above news release has been provided by the above company via the OTC Disclosure and News Service. Issuers of news releases and not OTC Markets Group Inc. are solely responsible for the accuracy of such news releases.












 



 








































infOsci


















infOsci is changing the security paradigm.
Our patented method for protecting your systems and data ensures that unauthorized access is stopped dead in its tracks.


 Learn More
                    







In the News



infOsci announces its patented revolutionary cyber security system - Ci4
August 01, 2017
Cyber security disrupter infOsci today announced that the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office has awarded a broad method patent to infOsci for its revolutionary technological approach to security. The Ci4 technology replaces an outdated security infrastructure relying on secret passwords, private keys or digital certificates. Ci4 effectively defeats the attacker who uses stolen credentials and greatly diminishes threats posed by human error in the security chain.

 Read More
                    




This Tech Startup’s Youngest Founder Is 75.
July 27, 2017, Bloomberg
Infosci, at work on anti-hacking software, is run by the older set. “They’ve been exposed to the nastiest stuff for decades.”

 Read More on Bloomberg
                    










infOsci and Arkados Group Announce Joint Development Partnership
June 01, 2017, Globe Newswire
Cyber security disrupter infOsci today announced a joint development partnership with Arkados Group, Inc. (OTC:AKDS), a leading software developer and system integrator enabling Internet of Things (IoT) applications, whereby Arkados will pilot infOsci’s revolutionary security technology in conjunction with various commercial and industrial applications.

 Read More on Globe Newswire
                    







About



infOsci is a disruptive technology company with deep roots in the intelligence community and information security that has developed the future of cyber security, by creating a truly secure authentication method between devices. This technology will provide companies with cyber resilience by replacing obsolete and insecure digital certificates (SSL) with dynamic certificates. This constantly changing dynamic information protects the security architecture and provides security even in an environment where user credentials have been or will be stolen or compromised.


Introducing Ci4
infOsci’s patented intellectual property Ci4 can be licensed and easily deployed within a company’s existing cyber security infrastructure. The infOsci process uses the current digital certificate and login process, and replaces the broken Secure Socket Layer (SSL) that is the obsolete underlying infrastructure security.



 Get in touch with us
                    







Team



John Ellingson
Founding and Managing Member, Co-Inventor of infOsci IP
John is a pioneer in the development and deployment of innovative human factor malevolent behavior anomaly detection. John has a proven history of innovation and development of identity fraud detection and human factor insider threat detection systems.
He is the inventor of core identity security patent (US Patent 6871287) broadly deployed in the financial services industry for identity fraud detection, identity validation, biometrics, false response reduction.  He has a number of method patents pending in network security.
John was an early Ambassador for Privacy by Design and a champion of information privacy.  He has a track record of innovation and leadership in the detection and prevention of fraud in the digital environment and in identity fraud in financial services. As a practicing attorney John was among the first to use forensic accounting techniques in the discovery and prosecution of large fraud cases.


Tom Ottoson
Founding Member and Co-inventor of infOsci IP
Tom heads security operations for Harris Corporation. He is formerly the CEO and co-founder of LemonFish Technologies - LemonFish is a data science and behavior analytics company building and deploying proactive solutions against data leakage, fraud and insider threats.  
Prior to this he was the Technical Director within the Office of the Director of National Intelligence (ODNI) responsible for developing an Executive Branch-wide program to continuously evaluate persons with security clearances. 
Tom served over 20 years in the U.S. Navy as a naval intelligence officer and Navy SEAL. His naval service included operational tours for the Navy's Special Programs office supporting Special Mission Unit activities and as a Navy SEAL attached to SEAL Teams 8, 4 and the Joint Special Operations Command (JSOC). Non-operational tours include duty as the Asst. Executive Officer for the Defense Intelligence Agency and Asst. Deputy Director for Intelligence for the Joint Chiefs of Staff. His military awards include the Bronze Star, Defense Meritorious Service Medal, Combat Action Ribbon, Navy SEAL Insignia, Advanced Parachutist Insignia, and the Joint Chiefs of Staff Identification Badge. He has a Degree in Health Science from Campbell University.


Jon Monett
Founding Member
Jon founded Raytheon Telemus, Inc. and served as its Chief Executive Officer. He has directed the efforts of Raytheon Telemus, Inc. into areas, where technology and international experience are the preferred, mutually complimentary tools for success in the global marketplace. He was a Senior Executive Officer in the United States Government. 
Over the course of his career, he has directed large-scale security evaluations at facilities throughout the world. He has worked on all continents and has a first-hand understanding of the specific nature of terrorist threats and the most successful risk-mitigation strategies against various types of potential attacks. 
He has built the Vulnerability Assessment Program at Raytheon Telemus, Inc. on the twin pillars of physical security expertise and rigorous intelligence gathering and analysis. He serves as a Director of Chain Bridge Bank, National Association, Chain Bridge Bancorp, Inc. and Chain Bridge Bancorp, Inc. He holds a Degree in Engineering from California Polytechnic State University and a Masters Degree in International Transactions from George Mason University.




Phil Dean
Founding Member
Phil has decades of experience in technology and counter intelligence with the Central Intelligence Agency. His experience includes his role as Director, Far East Technical Operations Base where he directed a diverse group of engineers, scientists, technicians and craftsmen in providing technical solutions to intelligence collection requirements. He led teams of technical officers in devising innovative solutions to discreet and difficult personal communications and electronic intelligence collection problems. He also led projects to fabricate specialized equipment used for transportation and storage of devices. 
Phil established a small group of highly competent senior engineers in the newly created counter-terrorism center to guide all agency technical projects to counter worldwide terrorism. He represented the CIA in numerous interagency forums dealing with terrorism, including the FBI, State Department, Department of Energy, and the Department of Defense.  As Chief of the Equipment Suitability Division, he was Director of a laboratory whose function was to test and evaluate equipment developed under the direction of the CIA, often by external contractors. 


John Kittelberger
Founding Member
John is the founder of J. Kittelberger & Sons, Inc., in January 1977 and brings over 40 years of business expertise to infOsci. Kittelberger Plumbing, has operated in the Springfield area since its inception and serves all of Northern Virginia.  Customers range from consumers to small and large businesses. He brings decades of sound and practical business experience.


Jochum Shore & Trossevin
Founding Member
The principals of JST, Jim Jochum and Andrew Shore, combine nearly 50 years of private and public sector experience in Washington, D.C.  Jim was appointed twice by President George W. Bush to senior positions at the Department of Commerce after serving six years as a staff member in the U.S. Senate.  Andrew served as the Chief of Staff for the House Republican Conference, a position that earned him accolades on the Hill and has led to regular quotes and appearances in the media since moving to the private sector.
JST advises companies on lobbying and communication strategies to reach the next level of success.  Past and present clients include Lyft, Snapchat, Hyperloop, Accenture, Google and eBay as well as start-ups Elio Motors, Midstream Methanol and Intrabio.





Caroline Lynch
Advisory Board Member
Caroline is the founder and owner of Copper Hill Strategies, LLC. She has fifteen years of Capitol Hill experience, including a decade with the House Judiciary Committee where she served for eight years as the Chief Counsel of the Subcommittee on Crime, Terrorism, Homeland Security, and Investigations. As Chief Counsel, she was at the forefront of developing some of the most high-profile privacy, cybersecurity, national security, and criminal laws of the 21st Century. She authored dozens of pieces of legislation and developed strategies to successfully shepherd those bills through Congress. She utilizes her expertise in public policy and the legislative process to provide client-focused government relations, strategic planning, and legislative development services. 


Paul Brubaker
Advisor
Paul combines a unique blend of senior level public policy and private sector leadership with proven experience creating breakthrough innovations through the convergence of policy, practice, and technology. His experience includes serving as the Research and Innovative Technology Administrator at the U.S. Department of Transportation; Chairman of Virginia’s Center for Innovative Technology; Deputy Assistant Secretary of Defense (DCIO); Minority Staff Director of the Senate Subcommittee on Oversight ; CEO of Aquilent, Procentrix and Synteractive; EVP/CMO SI International; and VP of Litton PRC and IT Cadre.





Nuvitek, LLC
Ops Team
Led by principals Venkat Veeramneni, Fadi Harake and Marc Fain, Nuvitek is a talented team of engineers who are passionate about solving technology problems. Nuvitek provides a full life cycle of cloud based complex information technology services to federal and other public-sector customers including Cloud Assessment and Readiness, transition, migration, and system integration operations services. Nuvitek has been at the forefront of cloud computing and virtualization technologies that propel growth, foster innovation, and enable a superior digital experience to all users.  Their core capabilities include cloud computing, integrated cyber and Information Assurance (IA) services, as well as, network engineering.  Nuvitek’s solutions help reduce total cost of ownership and enhance operational excellence.  With its strong pool of talented, expert staff, Nuvitek has a sterling track record of providing innovative and reliable IT solutions to both government and commercial clients.







Contact



For general inquiries
To learn more on how we can help your organization's cyber resilience or to license our patented IP please contact: 

 getintouch@ci4.us
                    


For press inquiries
Interested in a media kit about our product or team, please contact: Jim JochumJochum Shore & Trossevin PC,Phone: 202-281-4886Email: jjjochum@jstpc.com



























infOsci announces its patented revolutionary cyber security system - Ci4
August 01, 2017
Cyber security disrupter infOsci today announced that the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office has awarded a broad method patent to infOsci for its revolutionary technological approach to security. The Ci4 technology replaces an outdated security infrastructure relying on secret passwords, private keys or digital certificates. Ci4 effectively defeats the attacker who uses stolen credentials and greatly diminishes threats posed by human error in the security chain.
infOsci’s patented method provides companies with cyber resilience by replacing obsolete and insecure digital certificates (SSL) with dynamic certificates. This constantly changing dynamic information protects the security architecture and provides security even in an environment where user credentials have been compromised. infOsci’s intellectual property can be licensed and easily deployed within a company’s existing cyber security infrastructure. 
"Despite spending billions annually, data beaches are increasing in both size and frequency," said infOsci founder John Ellingson. “infOsci’s method will dramatically increase security, decrease the risk of security breaches, allow companies to recover quickly at reduced costs following a breach, and decrease the damage of a security breach.”
The current cyber security paradigm is focused on making the “fortress” stronger - stronger encryption, better passwords, better firewalls, and more complex technology to keep attackers out, but oftentimes, enemies are using the credentials of those already "within" the "fortress." More than 60% of cyber security breaches are the result of the unauthorized use of trusted credentials, including user IDs, passwords, and private keys. No matter how strong or complex, in the hands of an attacker, they convey all the authority of the legitimate holder of the credential. As a result, a single point of failure can cost an organization millions of dollars and reputational harm - and the average organization suffers at least one major failure per year.
Patented Ci4 technology brings the security of the dynamic digital certificate to mobile devices, the IoT, systems on a chip as well as critical infrastructure.
About infOsci 
infOsci is a disruptive technology company based in Northern Virginia that has developed the future of cyber security by creating a truly secure authentication method between devices. This technology will provide companies with cyber resilience by replacing obsolete and insecure digital certificates (SSL) with dynamic certificates. This constantly changing dynamic information protects the security architecture and provides security even in an environment where user credentials have been or will be stolen or compromised.
Patent No. 9,722,803
http://patentsgazette.uspto.gov/week31/OG/Cpc-h.html
infOsci was recently featured in Business Week
https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2017-07-27/this-tech-startup-s-youngest-founder-is-75
Investor Relations:
www.kremgroup.com
 Close

















Arkados Group, Inc. 8-K Nov  3 2016 | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Arkados Group, Inc. (AKDS)FORM 8-K | Current reportNov  3 2016|About: Arkados Group, Inc. (AKDS)View as PDF

 ARKADOS GROUP, INC. (Form: 8-K, Received: 11/03/2016 06:13:23) 










	 




	U.S. SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION



	 



	Washington, D.C. 20549



	 



	FORM 8-K



	 



	CURRENT REPORT



	 



	PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF




	THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934



	 


	Date of Report (Date of earliest event
	reported):

	November 2, 2016



	 





	Arkados Group, Inc. 



	(Exact name of Company as specified in
	its charter)


	 






	Delaware






	000-27587






	 22-3586087







	(State or other jurisdiction


	of incorporation)




	(Commission File Number)




	(IRS Employer Identification No.)






	  


	211 Warren Street, Suite 320


	Newark, NJ 07103


	(Address of principal executive offices)


	 



	Telephone:

	(862) 393-1988


	(Registrant's Telephone Number)


	 


	Check the appropriate box below if the
	Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the Company under any of the following provisions:


	 







	¨




	Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act
	(17 CFR 230.425)





	 







	¨




	Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act
	(17 CFR 240.14a-12)





	 







	¨




	Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the
	Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))





	 







	¨




	Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the
	Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))





	 




	 





	 




	 







	Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition



	 


	On November 2, 2016,
	Arkados Group, Inc. (the “Company”) issued a press release announcing its first quarter results for the fiscal first
	quarter ending August 31, 2016. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on SEC Form 8-K
	and is incorporated herein by reference.


	 


	The information included in this Item 2.02
	of this Current Report on Form 8-K, including the attached Exhibit 99.1, shall not be deemed “filed” for purposes of
	Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange Act”), or incorporated by reference in
	any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific
	reference in such filing.




	 







	Item 9.01 Financial Statement and Exhibits



	 


	(d) Exhibits.


	 






	Exhibit




	No.




	 




	Description






	 


	 


	 





	99.1*



	 



	Press release, dated November 2, 2016





	 






	 




	* Furnished herewith.


	 




	 





	 




	 


	Pursuant to the requirements
	of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned
	hereunto duly authorized.


	 




	 




	Arkados Group, Inc.



	(Registrant)





	 


	 





	November 2, 2016




	By:




	/s/ Terrence DeFranco





	 


	 



	Terrence DeFranco


	Chief Executive Officer







	 




	 













	Exhibit 99.1



	 



	Arkados Group,
	Inc. Reports Fiscal First Quarter 2017 Results



	.

	 




	Revenues up nearly 400% Year-Over-Year,
	Reflect Rising Demand for Energy Conservation Services and Industrial Internet of Things Solutions



	 


	NEWARK, N.J., November 2, 2016 -- Arkados Group, Inc. (OTCQB:
	AKDS), a global provider of scalable and interoperable Internet of Things (IoT) solutions focused on industrial automation and
	energy management, today announced and commented on the Company’s consolidated financial and operational results for the
	fiscal first quarter 2017 ending on August 31, 2016.


	 


	Financial and Operational Highlights for the Three Months Ended
	August 31, 2016:


	 






	-


	Revenues increased to $424,487, up $106,836 or 397% year-over-year, due to an increase in demand for our energy conservation
	services business;




	 






	-


	Net loss decreased year-over-year from ($528,761) to ($286,974), as a result of lower operating expenses and an increase in
	revenue; and,




	 






	-


	Launched our boiler conversion services to reduce energy costs and help local property owners comply with NY local law 43.
	Our initial customer is a local university for a two-site Oil-to-Natural Gas boiler conversion.




	 


	“We are very pleased with our first quarter results. Our
	financial performance continues to improve with extraordinary year-over-year revenue growth and an expansion of our services, products
	and customer base. In Fiscal Year 2017 we expect to continue to expand our services business with additional, value-add offerings,
	and introduce new, cutting-edge technology products, both with the goal of reducing cost and improving productivity for our commercial
	and industrial customers. The forthcoming products will run on our recently released Arktic software platform and leverage the
	unique scalability and interoperability that commercial applications demand. We look forward to a very successful year and to further
	establishing Arkados as a leading provider of Industrial Internet of Things solutions for smart building, smart city and smart
	machine applications.”


	  


	The Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
	ended August 31, 2016 is on file with Securities and Exchange Commission. To access the report visit

	http://ir.arkadosgroup.com/

	.


	 


	The Industrial Internet of Things is an explosive opportunity
	according to research firm Markets and Markets, which projects the IIoT market size to reach $151 billion by 2020 and just the
	smart building segment to reach $24 billion.


	 


	In a November 2015 press release, Gartner estimates that the
	Internet of Things will support total professional services (defined as external providers that design, install and operate IoT
	systems for businesses under contract) spending of $235 billion in 2016, up 22% from 2015, and that connectivity services (through
	communications service providers) and consumer services will grow at an even faster pace. Another more recent Gartner report estimates
	IoT deployment in commercial buildings is on track to reach just over 1 billion in 2018.


	 


	Verizon’s The Internet of Things 2015 report revealed
	that among organizations having integrated IoT into their operations, 82% reported increased efficiency; 49% saw enhancements in
	product quality; and 45% claimed IoT technology has increased customer satisfaction.



	 




	About Arkados Group, Inc.



	 


	Arkados Group, Inc. through its subsidiaries is a global
	provider of scalable and interoperable Internet of Things (IoT) solutions focused on industrial automation and energy management.
	The Company’s solutions are uniquely designed to drive a wide variety of wireless and powerline communication (PLC)-based
	products, such as sensors, gateways, video cameras, appliances and other devices. By utilizing the Company’s solutions,
	Arkados’ customers can bring numerous sophisticated, full-featured products to market faster at a lower overall development
	cost.  Arkados® is a registered trademark of Arkados Group, Inc. For more information about Arkados, please
	visit us at 

	http://www.arkadosgroup.com

	, and follow us on 

	Facebook

	, 

	LinkedIn

	, 

	Twitter

	 and

	Google+

	.



	 




	 




	 





	 




	Forward-Looking Statements



	 


	This news release contains forward-looking statements as defined
	by the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements include statements concerning plans, objectives,
	goals, strategies, future events or performance, and underlying assumptions and other statements that are other than statements
	of historical facts. These statements are subject to uncertainties and risks including, but not limited to, insufficient working
	capital, product and service demand and acceptance, changes in technology, economic conditions, the impact of competition and pricing,
	government regulations, and other risks contained in reports filed by the company with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
	All such forward-looking statements, whether written or oral, and whether made by or on behalf of the company, are expressly qualified
	by this cautionary statement and any other cautionary statements which may accompany the forward-looking statements. In addition,
	the company disclaims any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date
	hereof.



	 




	Investor Contact:



	 


	Investor Relations


	 


	investors@arkadosgroup.com


	 



	 















Collaboration Agreement, Collaboration Contracts - Free Legal Documents (page 1 Of 16)

















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Collaboration Agreement    

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents













SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>








Collaboration Agreements 





	These Collaboration Agreements are actual legal documents drafted by top law firms for their clients. Use them for competitive intelligence, drafting documents or to get information about transactions within a particular industry or sector. We have millions of legal documents and clauses that you can search for free.	



1) POWER SOLUTIONS INTERNATIONAL ANNOUNCES STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: POWER SOLUTIONS INTERNATIONAL, INC. | Power Solutions International, Inc | Weichai America Corp | Weichai Power Co, Ltd 
								Law Firm: Reed Smith
								Document Date: 3/27/2017

2) Design Phase Underway for Studies to be Conducted by National Research Council and LexariaParties: LEXARIA BIOSCIENCE CORP. | Lexaria Bioscience Corp 
								
								Document Date: 3/16/2017

3) Agios Announces MTAP Pathway Research Program as Development Program and Development Candidate Under Master Research and Collaboration Agreement with Celgene - Investigational New Drug (IND) Submission Expected by Year End 2017Parties: AGIOS PHARMACEUTICALS INC | Agios Pharmaceuticals, Inc | Celgene Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017

4) COLLABORATION, DEVELOPMENT AND LICENSE AGREEMENTParties: TESARO, INC. | TESARO Development Ltd | TESARO, Inc | Zai Lab (Shanghai) Co, Ltd 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
5) AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO COLLABORATION AND LICENSE AGREEMENTParties: TESARO, INC. | Janssen Biotech, Inc | TESARO, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017

6) FIRST AMENDMENT TO COLLABORATION AND LICENSE AGREEMENTParties: EXELIXIS, INC. | Exelixis, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017

7) Lexaria Signs Master Collaborative Research AgreementParties: LEXARIA BIOSCIENCE CORP. | Lexaria Bioscience Corp | Lexaria Canpharm Corp 
								
								Document Date: 2/14/2017

8) Microbot Medical Inc. Announces Research Collaboration AgreementParties: MICROBOT MEDICAL INC. | Microbot Medical Inc | Washington University School 
								
								Document Date: 1/30/2017

9) AMENDMENT TO THE AMENDED AND RESTATEDLICENSE AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: CYTOKINETICS INC | Astellas Pharma Inc | Cytokinetics, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/20/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:United States
10) LICENSE AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENT BETWEEN LES LABORATOIRES SERVIER INSTITUT DE RECHERCHES INTERNATIONALES SERVIER AND SORRENTO THERAPEUTICS, INC. License and Collaboration AgreementParties: SORRENTO THERAPEUTICS, INC. | Sorrento Therapeutics, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/17/2017

11) LICENSE AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: ADVAXIS, INC. | ADVAXIS, INC | AMGEN INC 
								
								Document Date: 1/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
12) Adaptimmune confirms GSK Nomination of Second Adaptimmune Target under Strategic Multi-Target CollaborationParties: ADAPTIMMUNE THERAPEUTICS PLC | PHILADELPHIA, Pa 
								
								Document Date: 1/9/2017

13) Assembly Biosciences, Inc. Corporate Presentation January 2017 Nasdaq: ASMBParties: ASSEMBLY BIOSCIENCES, INC. | Assembly Biosciences, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/9/2017

14) AFFILIATION AGREEMENTParties: ALMOST FAMILY INC | AF-CH-HH, LLC | CHSPSC, LLC | Home Health Services | National Health Industries, Inc | UNITED HOME CARE, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 1/6/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Tennessee
15) Momenta Provides Year-End 2016 Corporate UpdateParties: MOMENTA PHARMACEUTICALS INC | Momenta Pharmaceuticals, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/6/2017

16) Conatus Announces Exclusive Worldwide Option, Collaboration and License Agreement Covering Development and Commercialization of EmricasanParties: CONATUS PHARMACEUTICALS INC. | Conatus Pharmaceuticals Inc 
								
								Document Date: 12/19/2016

17) COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: ALMOST NEVER FILMS INC. | Almost Never Films, Inc | Saisam Entertainment, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 12/13/2016

18) EX-99.1Parties: INOVALON HOLDINGS, INC. | INOVALON UPDATES FULL YEAR 2016 FINANCIAL 
								
								Document Date: 12/12/2016

19) SECOND AMENDMENT OF THE LICENSE AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: SIGNAL GENETICS, INC. | 6200 Lookout Rd, Suite 100, Boulder, CO | Miragen Therapeutics, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 12/2/2016

20) AMENDMENT No. 1 TO LICENSE AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: SIGNAL GENETICS, INC. | miRagen Therapeutics, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 12/2/2016

21) FIRST AMENDMENT OF THE LICENSE AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: SIGNAL GENETICS, INC. | 6200 Lookout Rd, Suite 100, Boulder, CO | Miragen Therapeutics, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 12/2/2016

22) LICENSE AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: SIGNAL GENETICS, INC. | 6200 Lookout Rd, Suite 100, Boulder, CO | Miragen Therapeutics, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 12/2/2016

23) LICENSE AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: SIGNAL GENETICS, INC. | 6200 Lookout Road, Suite 100, Boulder, CO | MIRAGEN THERAPEUTICS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 12/2/2016

24) THIRD AMENDMENT OF THE LICENSE AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: SIGNAL GENETICS, INC. | 6200 Lookout Rd, Suite 100, Boulder, CO | Miragen Therapeutics, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 12/2/2016

25) FOURTH AMENDMENT OF THE LICENSE AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: SIGNAL GENETICS, INC. | 6200 Lookout Rd, Boulder, CO | Miragen Therapeutics, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 12/2/2016

26) DEVELOPMENT COLLABORATION AgreementParties: MOLECULIN BIOTECH, INC. | Moleculin Biotech, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 11/21/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
27) COLLABORATIVE RESEARCH AGREEMENTParties: ENDRA LIFE SCIENCES INC. | ENDRA Inc 
								
								Document Date: 11/21/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
28) COLLABORATION AGREEMENT "FIELD TRIPParties: ALMOST NEVER FILMS INC. | Almost Never Films, Inc | Konwiser Brothers Media 
								
								Document Date: 11/18/2016

29) MASTER IVD COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: FOUNDATION MEDICINE, INC. | F Hoffmann-La Roche Ltd | Foundation Medicine, Inc | Grenzacherstrasse 124, 4070 Basel, Switzerland and Roche Molecular Systems, Inc | Roche Holdings, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 11/16/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
30) THIRD AMENDMENT TO COLLABORATION AND LICENSE AGREEMENTParties: BLUEPRINT MEDICINES CORP | Blueprint Medicines Corporation | F Hoffmann-La Roche Ltd | Grenzacherstrasse 124, 4070 Basel, Switzerland and Hoffmann-La Roche Inc 
								
								Document Date: 11/10/2016

31) MASTER COLLABORATION AGREEMENT for Compani Confidential and Proprietary Information of Blueprint and QIAGENParties: BLUEPRINT MEDICINES CORP | Blueprint Medicines Corporation | Qiagen Manchester Limited 
								
								Document Date: 11/10/2016

32) STRATEGIC ALLIANCE AGREEMENTParties: ADAPTIMMUNE THERAPEUTICS PLC | 2001 Market Street, Philadelphia, PA | Adaptimmune Limited | Adaptimmune LLC 
								
								Document Date: 11/10/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
33) CLINICAL TRIAL COLLABORATION AND SUPPLY AGREEMENTParties: ADAPTIMMUNE THERAPEUTICS PLC | Adaptimmune Limited | Merck Sharp  Dohme BV 
								
								Document Date: 11/10/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
34) COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: AMYRIS, INC. | Amyris, Inc | GINKGO BIOWORKS, INC 
								Law Firm: Latham Watkins;Shearman Sterling
								Document Date: 11/9/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
35) COLLABORATION, OPTION AND LICENSE AGREEMENT BETWEEN OCULAR THERAPEUTIX, INC. AND REGENERON PHARMACEUTICALS, INC. TABLE OF CONTENTSParties: OCULAR THERAPEUTIX, INC | Regeneron Pharmaceuticals, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 11/9/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
36) COLLABORATION, OPTION AND LICENSE AGREEMENTParties: ADVERUM BIOTECHNOLOGIES, INC. | ADVERUM BIOTECHNOLOGIES, INC | EDITAS MEDICINE, INC 
								
								Document Date: 11/8/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
37) LICENSE AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: SAREPTA THERAPEUTICS, INC. | SAREPTA THERAPEUTICS, INC | SUMMIT (OXFORD) LTD 
								Law Firm: Ropes Gray
								Document Date: 11/7/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
38) Aimmune Therapeutics Announces $145 Million Equity Investment by Nestlé Health Science, Demonstrating Shared Commitment to Advancing Food Allergy Therapeutics ? Nestlé Health Science to Make Investment through the Purchase of Nearly 7.6 Million Shares of Aimmune Stock at $19.20 per Share ? ? CompaniParties: AIMMUNE THERAPEUTICS, INC. | Aimmune Management | Nestlé Health Science CEO Greg Behar Will Join Aimmune Board 
								
								Document Date: 11/4/2016

39) CLINICAL TRIAL COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: NEKTAR THERAPEUTICS | Nektar TherapeuticsBristol-Myers Squibb Company | Ono Pharmaceutical Co Ltd 
								
								Document Date: 11/4/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
40) LICENSE AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: GENOCEA BIOSCIENCES, INC. | GENOCEA BIOSCIENCES, INC | ISCONOVA AB 
								Law Firm: Ropes Gray
								Document Date: 11/4/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Massachusetts
41) COLLABORATION, DEVELOPMENT AND LICENSE AGREEMENTParties: TESARO, INC. | TESARO Development Ltd | TESARO, Inc | Zai Lab (Shanghai) Co, Ltd 
								
								Document Date: 11/4/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
42) COLLABORATIVE DEVELOPMENT AND LICENSE AGREEMENTParties: IMMUNOGEN INC | BIOTEST AG | IMMUNOGEN, INC 
								Law Firm: Kaye Scholer;Mintz Levin
								Document Date: 11/4/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
43) COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: REGENERON PHARMACEUTICALS INC | Teva Pharmaceuticals 
								
								Document Date: 11/4/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
44) FIRST AMENDMENT TO CO-DEVELOPMENT AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: AVEO PHARMACEUTICALS INC | AVEO Pharmaceuticals, Inc | Biodesix, Inc | Biodesix-AVEO Pharmaceuticals 
								
								Document Date: 11/4/2016

45) AMENDMENT TO THE AMENDED AND RESTATEDLICENSE AND COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: CYTOKINETICS INC | Astellas Pharma Inc | Cytokinetics, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 11/3/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:United States
46) RESEARCH COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: CERULEAN PHARMA INC. | BioMedical Research, Inc | Cerulean Pharma Inc 
								
								Document Date: 11/3/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
47) FIRST AMENDMENT TO COLLABORATION, LICENSE AND OPTION AGREEMENTParties: CURIS INC | AURIGENE DISCOVERY TECHNOLOGIES LIMITED | CURIS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 11/3/2016

48) AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO COLLABORATION AND LICENSE AGREEMENTParties: XENCOR INC | BioMedical Research, Inc | Xencor, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 11/2/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
49) THIRD AMENDMENT TO COLLABORATION AGREEMENTParties: FOUNDATION MEDICINE, INC. | F Hoffmann-La Roche Ltd | Foundation Medicine, Inc | Hoffmann-La Roche Inc 
								
								Document Date: 11/2/2016

50) EXHIBIT 10.1Parties: ACELRX PHARMACEUTICALS INC | ACELRX PHARMACEUTICALS, INC | EU, NA 
								
								Document Date: 11/2/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
 




Browse by StateGo directly to a specific page of results:12345678910111213141516 
 
 

 












